Utah statutes.
17B-2a-516.   Diversions of water subject to eminent domain law.
Nothing in this part may be construed to authorize any person to divert the
water of a river, creek, stream, canal, or reservoir to the detriment of
anyone having a prior right to the water, unless compensation is previously
determined and paid according to the laws of eminent domain.
